California, session 20252026, AB834.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17072 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:17072. (a) Section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to adjusted gross income defined, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.(b) Section For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2026, and on or after January 1, 2031, Section 62(a)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain expenses of elementary and secondary school teachers, shall not apply.(c) Section 62(a)(21) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to attorneys fees relating to awards to whistleblowers, shall not apply.SEC. 2. For purposes of complying with Section 41 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, with respect to the deduction from gross income in computing adjusted gross income allowed by the amendment to Section 17072 of the Revenue and Taxation Code made by this act, the Legislature finds and declares the following:(a) The specific purpose of the deduction is to achieve conformity with federal law and support teachers that incur the costs of classroom supplies, materials, and professional development, which benefit students.(b) To the extent that data is available to be collected, the Franchise Tax Board shall collect the number of taxpayers claiming the deduction, the average amount of the deduction claimed by taxpayers, and descriptions of the expenses deducted to determine if the deduction is conforming with federal law, supporting teachers, and benefitting students.SEC. 3. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation that would allow a credit against the personal income taxes of teachers.